Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 6. Government Royalty Revenue

Cross references. —

As to duty of joint revenue committee to submit a report every fourth year to the governor and legislature, reviewing the distribution formulae for federal mineral royalties, severance taxes and inheritance taxes, see §

28-1-118

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 9-4-601.
Distribution and use; funds, accounts, cities and towns benefited; exception for bonus payments.

All monies received by the state of Wyoming from the secretary of the treasury of the United States under the provisions of the act of congress of February 25, 1920 (41 Stat. 437, 450; 30 U.S.C. §§ 181, 191), as amended, or from lessees or authorized mine operators and all monies received by the state from its sale of production from federal mineral leases subject to the act of congress of February 25, 1920 (41 Stat. 437, 450; 30 U.S.C. §§ 181, 191) as amended, except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, shall be deposited into an account and the first two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00) of revenues received in any fiscal year shall be distributed by the state treasurer as provided in this subsection. One percent (1%) of these revenues shall be credited to the general fund as an administrative fee, and the remainder shall be distributed as follows:

Two and one-quarter percent (2 1/4%) to the highway fund to be expended by the transportation commission for permanent construction or maintenance work in the counties to which the royalties are attributable with priority given to roads and highways impacted by mineral development;

Subject to paragraph (xi) of this section, forty-four and eight-tenths percent (44.8%) to the public school foundation program account subject to allocations under W.S.

9-4-605

;

Except as provided by W.S.

9-4-605

(a), and as otherwise provided in this paragraph, twenty-six and one-quarter percent (26 1/4%) to the highway fund subject to allocations under W.S.

9-4-607

. For fiscal years 2023 and 2024 funds under this paragraph shall be distributed to the general fund until such time as the distributions under this paragraph for both fiscal years 2023 and 2024 cumulatively equal the amount of funds received by the state of Wyoming and allocated to the department of transportation from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, Section 602 for the provision of government services under Section 602(c)(1)(C). Upon reaching the total allocation from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, under Section 602(c)(1)(C) and after the conditions of this paragraph have been met, the excess shall be credited to the highway fund;

Six and three-quarters percent (6 3/4%) to a separate account for the University of Wyoming. This revenue may be used only for the actual and necessary expenses of constructing, equipping and furnishing new buildings, the repairing of existing buildings, the purchasing of improved or unimproved real estate, the payment of principal and interest on securities issued to finance projects authorized by the legislature or for the payment of principal and interest on securities issued to refund the securities. Payments from this revenue shall be made by the state treasurer only for expenditures approved by the trustees of the university, provided that expenditures for capital construction projects shall only be for projects authorized by the legislature. The trustees of the university are authorized to approve expenditures from this revenue for the payment of principal and interest on any outstanding securities issued pursuant to this paragraph in accordance with the terms of the securities. The trustees of the university shall include within the university’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report on all expenditures under this paragraph in each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years;

Nine and three-eighths percent (9.375%) to incorporated cities and towns to be used for planning, construction or maintenance of public facilities or providing public services. Any city or town may expend these revenues or pledge future revenues for payment of revenue bonds issued to provide public facilities. However no city or town shall pledge future revenues to the federal government under 43 U.S.C. § 1747 unless the city or town obtains a written determination from the governor, which he may make in connection with his consultation with the secretary of the interior under 43 U.S.C. § 1747 or otherwise, that the pledge will not affect the distribution of mineral royalties provided in this section. The distribution provided under this paragraph to any city or town shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount of federal mineral royalties withheld from the state by the federal government to repay any loan to the city or town under 43 U.S.C. § 1747. Pledges of this income for revenue bonds shall not exceed ten (10) years. Each city and town shall receive:

Twelve thousand dollars ($12,000.00) if the population is three hundred twenty-five (325) persons or less, or fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) if the population is more than three hundred twenty-five (325) persons; plus

An amount computed by the state treasurer as follows: after deducting the distribution provided by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the remainder shall be allocated for distribution to cities and towns within each county in an amount proportionate to the percentage obtained by dividing the average daily membership, as defined in W.S.

21-13-101

, of all school districts within each county by the total average daily membership of all school districts in the state. The distribution to each city and town will then be made in the proportion that the population of the city or town bears to the total population of all cities and towns in the county.

Three and seventy-five hundredths percent (3.75%) to the capital construction account to be expended as provided by W.S. 9-4-604(k)(i) or to fund bonds the proceeds of which will be used under W.S. 9-4-604(g) and one and twenty-five hundredths percent (1.25%) to the highway fund, except for fiscal years 2017 and 2018 funds directed to the highway fund under this paragraph shall be distributed to the general fund;

Two and seven-tenths percent (2.7%) to the public school capital construction account created by W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i);

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 82, § 2.

Two and twenty-five one-hundredths percent (2.25%), to the highway fund, except for fiscal years 2017 and 2018 funds under this paragraph shall be distributed to the general fund;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 137, § 1.

Five-eighths percent (.625%) to the highway fund, except for fiscal years 2017 and 2018 funds under this paragraph shall be distributed to the general fund.

and (B) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 137, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 2; ch. 206, § 2.

If insufficient funds are available under W.S. 39-14-801(j) to fully satisfy any delinquent payment owed by a city or county under W.S. 15-5-203(h), the state treasurer shall withhold from any payment due to a city or county under this subsection an amount as necessary to satisfy any delinquent payment owed by a city or county under W.S. 15-5-203(h). The withheld amount shall be deposited to the legislative stabilization reserve account and credited against the delinquent entity’s unpaid loan amount.

The state treasurer shall ascertain and withhold all bonus payments received from the federal government attributable to coal, oil shale or geothermal leases of federal land within Wyoming and shall distribute it as follows:

Fifty percent (50%), the first seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00) of which shall be distributed as follows, and any amount in excess of seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00) per year shall be deposited into the school capital construction account established under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i), except for fiscal years 2019, 2021 and 2022 amounts in excess of seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00) per year shall be deposited to the school foundation program reserve account created by W.S.

21-13-306

.1:

Three-fourths (3/4) shall be credited to the capital construction account for the purposes specified in W.S. 9-4-604(k)(i) or to fund bonds the proceeds of which will be used under W.S. 9-4-604(g);

One-fourth (1/4) to the highway fund.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 209, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4.

And:

Ten percent (10%) but not to exceed one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000.00) per year, to a separate account which may be expended by the community college commission in accordance with and in addition to appropriations available under W.S. 21-18-205(c). Any amount in excess of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000.00) together with any unexpended revenues within the account at the end of any biennial budget period shall be credited to the school capital construction account established under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i), except for fiscal years 2019, 2021 and 2022 these funds shall be deposited to the school foundation program reserve account created by W.S.

21-13-306

.1;

Forty percent (40%) to be deposited to the school capital construction account established under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i), except for fiscal years 2019, 2021 and 2022 these funds shall be deposited to the school foundation program reserve account created by W.S. 21-13-306.1.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 97, § 4.

Except as provided in subsections (k), (m) and (n) of this section, any revenue received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of two hundred million dollars ($ 200,000,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 97, § 4.

Subject to paragraphs (v), (vi) and (viii) of this subsection, one-third (1/3) to the school foundation program account;

Subject to paragraphs (vii) and (ix) of this subsection, two-thirds (2/3) to the budget reserve account;

From the amounts which would otherwise be distributed to the school foundation program account under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, amounts shall be deposited to the excellence in higher education endowment fund and the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vi) and (vii) in accordance with and subject to the requirements of this paragraph. The amounts specified in this paragraph shall be reduced as the state treasurer determines necessary to ensure that as of July 1 of each fiscal year, there is an unobligated, unencumbered balance of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00) within the school foundation program account. Distributions under this paragraph shall be as follows:

Seventy-nine percent (79%) to the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund, until that account balance equals four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000.00);

Twenty-one percent (21%) to the excellence in higher education endowment fund until distributions to that fund under this subparagraph equal one hundred five million dollars ($105,000,000.00);

After the amounts specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph are deposited to the appropriate fund, remaining funds shall be deposited pursuant to paragraph (vi) of this subsection and then to the school foundation program account as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection.

From the amounts which would otherwise be distributed to the school foundation program account under paragraph (iii) of this subsection and paragraphs (k)(i), (m)(i) and (n)(i) of this section, there is annually appropriated to the common school permanent fund reserve account the amount determined under W.S. 9-4-719(g). The appropriation shall be credited to the account as provided in W.S. 9-4-719(g);

From the amounts that would otherwise be distributed to the budget reserve account under paragraph (iv) of this subsection and paragraphs (k)(ii), (m)(ii) and (n)(ii) of this section, amounts necessary to make the required revenue bond payments as provided by W.S. 9-4-1003(d), but in no event more than eighteen million dollars ($ 18,000,000.00) annually;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 2; ch. 206, § 2.

For the period beginning July 1, 2019 and ending June 30, 2049, from the amounts that would otherwise be distributed to the budget reserve account under paragraph (iv) of this subsection, the first eight million dollars ($8,000,000.00) shall be distributed to a separate account for the University of Wyoming. These funds are continuously appropriated to the university upon deposit to the account. The University of Wyoming shall reduce its standard budget request for the 2021-2022 biennium by an amount equal to the maximum amount of funds authorized to be deposited under this paragraph. The University of Wyoming shall acknowledge this reduction of its 2021-2022 budget request pursuant to this paragraph in each standard budget request submitted to the governor’s office through June 30, 2048.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 97, § 4.

The state, should federal law not proscribe such action, is authorized and empowered to receive its gross percentage share of federal mineral royalties from the production of oil and gas which is due under the provisions of the act of congress of February 25, 1920 (41 Stat. 437, 450; 30 U.S.C. §§ 181, 191) as amended, in the form of the actual production from federal mineral leases covered under that act of congress. If directed by the governor, the production shall be taken by the state in lieu of royalty receipts. The production shall be taken in the same percentage of volume as the gross percentage of royalty proceeds allowed by the act of congress. Any sale or disposal of the production shall be administered by the director of the office of state lands and investments or his designee. The director, subject to criteria established by the governor, shall sell or dispose of any production taken by the state from federal mineral leases. Prior to receipt of any royalties, the director shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 45, § 2, ch. 62, § 2.

The state, should federal law not proscribe such action, is authorized and empowered to receive its gross percentage share of federal mineral royalties from the production of solid minerals which is due under the provisions of the act of congress of February 25, 1920 (41 Stat. 437, 450; 30 U.S.C. §§ 181, 191) as amended, in the form of a direct cash payment to the state from the lessee or authorized mine operator. If directed by the governor, such payment shall be taken by the state in lieu of royalty payments from the federal government. Prior to exercising this option, the director of the office of state lands and investments shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement this program which shall include defining the appropriate reporting requirements to ensure proper payment. To the extent possible, the rules and regulations shall rely on current reporting programs and avoid duplicative or additional administrative requirements. The state shall exercise such option for a minimum period of one (1) year and with no less than ninety (90) days notice to the lessee or authorized mine operator.

For the period beginning March 15, 2018 for fiscal years 2018, 2019 and 2020, any revenue received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:

For fiscal years 2018 and 2019, two-thirds (2/3) and for fiscal year 2020 one-half (1/2) to the school foundation program account; and

For fiscal years 2018 and 2019, one-third (1/3) and for fiscal year 2020 one-half (1/2) to the budget reserve account.

For fiscal year 2021, any revenue received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of four hundred eighty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($485,500,000.00) and for fiscal year 2022, any revenue received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of five hundred million eight hundred thousand dollars ($500,800,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:

One-half (1/2) to the school foundation program account; and

One-half (1/2) to the budget reserve account.

For fiscal year 2023, any revenue received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of four hundred fifty-nine million dollars ($ 459,000,000.00) and for fiscal year 2024, any revenue received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of four hundred twenty-nine million two hundred thousand dollars ($ 429,200,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:

Forty percent (40%) to the school foundation program account; and

Sixty percent (60%) to the budget reserve account.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 153, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-577.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-901; Laws 1979, ch. 159, §§ 2, 3; ch. 160, §§ 2, 3; 1980, ch. 56, § 1; 1982, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 53, § 1; 1985, ch. 202, § 1; ch. 208, § 2; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1988, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 82, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 36, § 2; ch. 181, § 2; 1990, ch. 118, § 1; 1991, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 29, § 3; ch. 230, § 2; ch. 234, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 91, § 7(a); ch. 93, § 204; ch. 96, § 2; 1993, ch. 220, § 1; 1994, ch. 15, § 319(d); ch. 83, § 1; 1995, ch. 137, § 1; 1997, ch. 187, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 601; 1998, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 5, §§ 2, 4; ch. 13, § 1; ch. 19, § 1; ch. 21, § 1; ch. 108, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; ch. 158, § 1; ch. 201, § 2; 2000, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 48, § 2; ch. 97, §§ 1, 4; 2001, ch. 209, §§ 1, 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; ch. 62, § 2; 2003, ch. 211, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 190, § 2, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, § 1; 2008, ch. 102, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, §§ 203, 204, 205; 2011, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 123, § 2; ch. 176, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 195, § 2, effective March 10, 2015; 2016 ch. 31, § 326, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 206, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 134, §§ 316(a), 317(a), effective March 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 80, § 347, effective February 26, 2019; 2019 ch. 206, § 2, effective March 15, 2019; 2020 ch. 80, §§
315, 316, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 51, § 315, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to state capital construction assistance, see §

21-15-111

.

As to duties of the community college commission in general, see §

21-18-202

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(vi), deleted “Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section” at the beginning, and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 190, § 2, in (d)(iii), inserted “Subject to paragraph (v) of this subsection”; and added (d)(v).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, in (a) and (a)(iv), substituted references to “an account” or “a separate account” for references to the trust and agency fund; and in (b)(iv)(A), substituted “a separate account” for “an earmarked revenue fund account.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating the amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2007 amendment,

in (d), inserted “excellence in” in two places, substituted “fund” for “account” throughout, in (d)(v), inserted “Hathaway” and substituted “9-4-204(u)(vi) and (vii)” for “21 16 1201.”

The 2008 amendment,

in (d)(iii), substituted “paragraphs (v) and (vi)” for “paragraph (v)”; in (d)(v)(C), inserted “pursuant to paragraph (vi) of this subsection and then”; and added (d)(vi).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(v)(A), deleted “according to the latest census estimate of the department of administration and information, division of economic analysis or the latest updated census as provided by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph” following “three hundred twenty-five (325) persons”; and in (a)(v)(B), deleted “based on the latest federal census as periodically updated by the bureau of the census.
Any city or town may use an updated census conducted by the bureau of the census at any time not less than four (4) years following the decennial census” from the end.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(iii), substituted “W.S.

9-4-607

” for “W.S.

9-4-606

and

9-4-607

”; in (b)(i), substituted “and any amount” for “but for the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004 and July 1, 2005 any amount in excess of seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00) shall be deposited in accordance with paragraph (v) of this subsection, and thereafter any amount”; in (b)(iv)(A), deleted the former second sentence, which read: “For the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004 and July 1, 2005, any amount in excess of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000.00) shall be deposited in accordance with paragraph (v) of this subsection,” and made a related change; rewrote (b)(iv)(B), which formerly read: “For the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004 and July 1, 2005, forty percent (40%) to be deposited in accordance with paragraph (v) of this subsection and thereafter to the school capital construction account established under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i)”; and repealed former (b)(v), which read: “For the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004 and July 1, 2005, after making the distributions provided for in paragraphs (i) and (iv) of this subsection the following amounts, as limited by and as reduced in accordance with this paragraph, shall be deposited in the business ready community account established by W.S.

9-12-602

. The amounts specified shall be deposited to the business ready community account in the fiscal year specified but only if as of July 1 of the specified fiscal year, using the most recent consensus revenue estimating group estimates, there is projected to be a positive balance in the school capital construction account as of June 30 of that fiscal year, after all appropriations from that account for the purposes specified in W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i), for that fiscal year are deducted. Amounts deposited to the business ready community account pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited as provided by W.S.

9-4-602

. These deposits shall be reduced as necessary to maintain a projected positive balance in the school capital construction account after all appropriations from that account for the purposes specified in W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i), for the applicable fiscal year, are deducted. After the amounts are deposited in the business ready community account in accordance with this paragraph, any remaining amounts shall be deposited in the school capital construction account established under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i): (A) For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2004 — seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00); (B) For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005 — ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00).”

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 40 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iv), deleted “when authorized by the legislature” following “This revenue may be used only,” and “these” preceding “projects” in the second sentence, inserted “authorized by the legislature,” deleted the former third sentence, which read: “Any proposed expenditures from this revenue shall be included in the budget of the university submitted to the governor,” substituted “for expenditures” for “upon properly itemized and receipted vouchers,” substituted the proviso for “and filed with the state auditor as provided by law,” deleted “Notwithstanding the requirement that proposed expenditures from this revenue be included in the university budget submitted to the governor” at the beginning of the next-to-last sentence, and added the last sentence.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 123 § 2, inserted “Subject to paragraph (vii) of this subsection” in (d)(iv); added (d)(vii); and made related changes.

The third 2011 amendment, by ch. 176 § 1, deleted “and” at the end of (d)(iv).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the other, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(iv), substituted “shall include within the university's biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report on all expenditures under this paragraph in each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years” for “shall report annually to the joint appropriations interim committee, the select committee on capital finance and investments and the governor on all expenditures under this paragraph.”

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), inserted “Subject to paragraph (xi) of this section,” at the beginning of the sentence in (ii), and added (xi); in (d) added (viii) in (iii); and added (viii).

Laws 2015, ch. 195, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(iii), inserted "and as otherwise provided in this paragraph" following "W.S. 9-4-605(a)" and the last sentence; inserted "except for fiscal years 2017 and 2018 funds directed to the highway fund under this paragraph shall be ditributed to the general fund" at the end of (a)(vi); and inserted "except for fiscal years 2017 and 2018 funds under this paragraph shall be ditributed to the general fund" at the end of (a)(ix) and (a)(x).

The 2017 amendments. —

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(xi) and (d)(viii).

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 206, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(xi) and (d)(viii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendments. —

The 2018 amendments. —

The first
2018 amendment, by ch. 134, § 316, in (d), added “Except as provided in subsection
(k) of this section” at the beginning; in (d)(vi), inserted
“and paragraph (k)(i) of this section”; in (d)(vii),
inserted “and paragraph (k)(ii) of this section”; and
added (k).

Laws 2018, ch. 134, § 400(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 134, § 317, effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i), added “except
for fiscal year 2019 amounts in excess of seven million five hundred
thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00) per year shall be deposited to the
school foundation program reserve account created by
W.S.

21-13-306

.1” at the end; in (b)(iv)(A), added “except
for fiscal year 2019 these funds shall be deposited to the school
foundation program reserve account created by
W.S.

21-13-306

.1” at the end; and in (b)(iv)(B), added “except
for fiscal year 2019 these funds shall be deposited
to the school
foundation program reserve account created by
W.S. 21-13-306.1” at the end.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 80, § 347, in the introductory language in (k), added “for fiscal years 2018, 2019 and 2020” following “March 15, 2018,” in (k)(i), substituted “For fiscal years 2018 and 2019, two-thirds (2/3) and for fiscal year 2020 one-half (1/2)” for “Two-thirds (2/3),” and in (k)(ii), substituted “For fiscal years 2018 and 2019, one-third (1/3) and for fiscal year 2020 one-half (1/2)” for “one-third (1/3).”

Laws 2019, ch. 80, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 206, § 2, in (d)(iv), substituted “paragraphs (vii) and (ix)” for “paragraph (vii),” and added (d)(ix).

Laws 2019, ch. 206 § 9, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 80, § 315, effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (d) substituted “provided in subsections (k) and (m)” for “provided in subsection (k)”; in (d)(vi) substituted “paragraphs (k)(i) and (m)(i)” for “paragraph (k)(i)”; in (d)(vii) substituted “paragraphs (k)(ii) and (m)(ii)” for “paragraph (k)(ii)”; and added (m).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 80, § 316, effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (b)(i), (b)(iv)(A), and (b)(iv)(B), substituted “fiscal years 2019, 2021 and 2022” for “fiscal year 2019.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022, added (a)(xii).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 51, § 315, effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(iii), in the second sentence, substituted “2023 and 2024” for “2017 and 2018,” added “until such time as the distributions under this paragraph for both fiscal years 2023 and 2024 cumulatively equal the amount of funds received by the state of Wyoming and allocated to the department of transportation from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117 2, Section 602 for the provision of government services under Section 602(c)(1)(C),” added the last sentence; added “and (n)” in the introductory language of (d); added “and (n)(i)” in the first sentence of (d)(vi); added “and (n)(ii)” in (d)(vii); added (n); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 335, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, appropriates from the school foundation program account to the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education Certifying Office at the University of Wyoming $600,000 of federal mineral royalty income received under the provisions of § 9-4-601(d)(iii) for the National American Indian, Alaskan and Hawaiian Educational Development Center to improve the education of Native American children but only if federal matching funds are received.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 6, appropriates $100,000 or as much thereof as is necessary from the general fund to the legislative service office to fund the education merit scholarship committee in carrying out its duties under the act (see notes at W.S.

21-16-1201

). Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

, unobligated or unencumbered funds appropriated under this section will not lapse as of June 30, 2006 but will remain available for funding of the committee as provided in the act. Prior to making any distribution to the student scholarship endowment account pursuant to W.S. 9-4-601(d)(v), the state treasurer is to first deposit to the general fund $100,000 from those funds as repayment of this appropriation.

Laws 2008, ch. 102, §
2, provides: “There is appropriated from the general fund to the school foundation program account an amount equal to the lesser of fifty-six million five hundred fourteen thousand four hundred fifty-five dollars ($56,514,455.00) or the funds distributed to the common school reserve account pursuant to section 1 of this act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008.
This transfer of funds shall be made immediately following that distribution to the common school reserve account.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applied

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 9-4-602.
Distribution and use; state treasurer's duty.

Except as hereafter provided, distribution under W.S.

9-4-601

shall be made by the state treasurer within thirty (30) days after the receipt of the government royalty funds for the preceding period. Federal mineral royalties received by the state on a continuing monthly basis shall be distributed under W.S.

9-4-601

by the state treasurer, subject to the following:

Federal mineral royalties earned during each fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that fiscal year for accounting purposes;

Except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, revenues which are both earned and received during the first three (3) calendar quarters of the fiscal year shall be distributed within the first ten (10) days of October, January and April. For the last quarter of each fiscal year, revenues earned or received shall be distributed not later than June 30. In computing distributions for the last quarter, the state treasurer shall use the most recent consensus revenue estimating group estimates to the extent that earnings cannot be determined by June 30. Not later than September 15, the state treasurer shall compute the actual earnings for the last quarter of the preceding fiscal year and make adjustments to the October distributions in an amount equal to the difference between revenues earned and actual distributions for the preceding fiscal year;

Federal mineral royalties to be distributed to the public school foundation program account under W.S. 9-4-601(a)(ii) and to or for local governments under W.S. 9-4-601(a)(v) and (vi) shall be distributed as follows:

For distributions to the public school foundation program account, distributions shall be made monthly in an amount equal to one-twelfth (1/12) of the amount estimated to be earned in the current fiscal year based upon the most recent consensus revenue estimating group estimates. For distributions to local governments, distributions shall be made quarterly in an amount equal to one-fourth (1/4) of the amount estimated to be earned in the current fiscal year based upon the most recent consensus revenue estimating group estimates. In computing distributions, the state treasurer shall make adjustments to reflect any changes in the consensus revenue estimating group estimates;

Not later than September 15, the state treasurer shall compute actual earnings for the preceding fiscal year and shall make adjustments to distributions during the current fiscal year in an amount equal to the difference between revenues earned and actual distributions for the preceding fiscal year.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 28, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 78-404; C.S. 1945, § 20-504; W.S. 1957, § 9-580; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-902; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 177, § 1; 1993, ch. 225, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 305; 2000, ch. 58, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

Cross references. —

As to state treasurer, see art. 4, § 11, Wyo. Const., and §

9-1-409

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “and except as otherwise provided by law for fiscal year 1994” following “to the following.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-4-603.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 230, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1979, ch. 159, § 1, related to the distribution and use of government royalty revenue for capital construction projects and bonds and for educational purposes.